Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.2 Drug Abuse Control

21-28.2-1.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall be construed in this chapter to have the following meanings:

“Department” means the department of health.

“Director” means the director of the department of health.

“Narcotic addict” means a person who is at the time of examination dependent upon opium, heroin, morphine, or any derivative or synthetic drug of that group or any other narcotic drug as defined in §

21-28-1.02

, or a depressant or stimulant substance, or who by reason of the repeated use of any such drug is in imminent danger of becoming dependent upon opium, heroin, morphine, or any derivative or synthetic drug of that group, or any other narcotic drug as defined in §

21-28-1.02

; or any person who is or has been so far addicted to the use of narcotic drugs as to have lost the power of self-control with reference to his or her addiction; provided, that no person shall be deemed a narcotic addict solely by virtue of his or her taking of any of the drugs pursuant to a lawful prescription issued by a physician in the course of professional treatment for legitimate medical purposes. For the purpose of this section, “depressant or stimulant substance” means:

A drug which contains any quantity of: (A) barbituric acid or any of the salts of barbituric acid; or (B) any derivative of barbituric acid which the director after investigation has found to be habit forming;

A drug which contains any quantity of: (A) amphetamine or any of its optical isomers; (B) any salt of amphetamine or any salt of an optical isomer of amphetamine; or (C) any substance which the director, after investigation, has found to be and by regulation designated as habit forming because of its stimulant effect on the central nervous system;

Lysergic acid diethylamide; or

Any drug which contains any quantity of a substance which the director, after investigation, has found to have and by regulation designated as having a potential for abuse because of its depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system or its hallucinogenic effect.

“Police officer” means any municipal or state police officer or any employee of the department with police powers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 40.

21-28.2-2.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall make any rules and regulations respecting the care and treatment of patients and persons referred to the department’s care and the management of the department’s affairs as are deemed necessary to carry out the expressed purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-3.
Admission of narcotic addict on civil certification.

A justice of the family court or a judge of the district court may certify a narcotic addict to the care and custody of the department in the following manner:

Except as provided in this section, whenever any narcotic addict desires to obtain treatment for his or her addiction, whenever a related individual has reason to believe that any person is a narcotic addict, or whenever the director of health has reason to believe that any person is a narcotic addict, the addict, related individual, or director of health may apply for an order certifying that person to the care and custody of the department by presenting a verified petition setting forth knowledge, information, or belief that the person is a narcotic addict, together with a statement of the facts upon which that knowledge, information, or belief is based. When the petition is presented, the court may examine the petitioner, or any witness, under oath and shall determine whether there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person in whose behalf the application is made is a narcotic addict. If the court determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict, and if the person is not also the petitioner, it shall issue an order in accordance with subdivision (2) of this section; provided, that if the court determines that the person would not comply with the order the court shall issue, in lieu of an order, a warrant in accordance with subdivision (3) of this section. When the alleged addict is the petitioner and the court determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict, the court shall immediately proceed in accordance with subdivision (4) of this section. The state shall be a party in all proceedings pursuant to this section and shall act on the relation of the petitioner. The attorney general shall represent the state.

An order issued pursuant to this section shall direct the alleged narcotic addict to appear at a specified time before the court for a determination whether there are reasonable grounds to order that person to undergo a medical examination at a facility or by two (2) physicians designated by the director. The court shall direct that the order and petition be served upon the alleged narcotic addict personally or by registered mail and the court may direct that the order and petition be served personally or by mail upon the husband or wife, father or mother, or next of kin of the alleged narcotic addict.

A warrant issued pursuant to this section shall be directed to any police officer in the state commanding the officer: (i) to take the alleged narcotic addict into custody, and (ii) to immediately bring the alleged narcotic addict before the court for a determination whether there are reasonable grounds to order him or her to undergo a medical examination at a facility designated by the department. If the court is not then in session, the alleged narcotic addict may be held at a facility designated by the department or at any other detention facility until the court is in session. In this case, the head of the facility or a duly appointed representative shall advise the alleged addict of the nature of the proceeding, the reason for his or her detention, and that he or she will appear before a judge at the next court session in connection with the allegation that he or she is a narcotic addict. This person shall also inform the alleged addict that he or she has the right to the aid of counsel at every stage of the proceedings, and that if the person desires the aid of counsel and is financially unable to obtain counsel, counsel shall be assigned by the court, and that he or she is entitled to communicate free of charge, by telephone or letter, in order to obtain counsel and in order to inform a relative or friend of the proceeding. The warrant may be executed on any day including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays and the alleged narcotic addict shall not be subjected to any more restraint than is necessary for the purposes specified in the warrant. The police officer shall exhibit the warrant to the alleged narcotic addict, and inform the alleged addict of the purpose for which he or she is being taken into custody. The officer shall not break open any outer or inner door or window of a building, or any part of the building, or anything in a building, to execute the warrant unless, if after notice of the officer’s authority and purpose, he or she is refused admittance. The warrant must be executed within thirty (30) days after its date and if not executed shall be void.

Upon the appearance of the alleged narcotic addict the court shall provide the alleged addict with a copy of any paper not yet served upon him or her and shall explain that, if the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict, it shall order him or her to undergo a medical examination at a facility or by two (2) physicians designated by the department. The court shall then advise the alleged narcotic addict that if the medical examination is ordered the alleged addict shall appear before the court after the examination as provided in paragraph (5)(i) of this section, and, if the petition and the report of the medical examination set forth reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict, he or she may after this be certified to the care and custody of the department for an indefinite period not exceeding three (3) years and that he or she shall have a right to a hearing prior to the certification. If the alleged narcotic addict appears without counsel, the court shall advise the person that he or she has the right to the aid of counsel at every stage of the proceedings, and that if he or she desires the aid of counsel and is financially unable to obtain counsel, then counsel shall be assigned. The court shall allow the alleged narcotic addict a reasonable time to send for counsel and shall adjourn the proceedings for that purpose. The court shall inform the alleged addict, if the person is being held in custody, that he or she is entitled to communicate free of charge, by letter or telephone, in order to obtain counsel and in order to inform a relative or friend of the proceeding. If the alleged narcotic addict does not desire the aid of counsel the court must determine that the person waived counsel having knowledge of the significance of his or her act. If the court is not satisfied that the alleged narcotic addict knows the significance of his or her act in waiving counsel, the court shall assign counsel.

If the court, after the appearance of the alleged addict, is satisfied that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict it shall issue an order directing the person to appear on a specified date and place for a medical examination in accordance with §

21-28.2-4

. A copy of this order shall be given to the person and a copy of the order and of any order or warrant issued in accordance with subdivisions (2), (3), or (6) of this section shall be furnished to the department.

If the court has reason to believe that the person will fail to appear for the medical examination, the order shall make provision commanding any police officer of the state to immediately take the person into custody and deliver him or her to the place specified for the medical examination.

Any order issued pursuant to this subdivision shall direct the person to appear before the court within seven (7) days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the person’s admission for the medical examination.

If the alleged narcotic addict fails to appear as directed by an order pursuant to this section, and the court is satisfied that timely service has been made or that service cannot be effected with due diligence, it may issue a warrant directed to any police officer in the state commanding the officer: (i) to take the alleged narcotic addict into custody, and (ii) to immediately bring the alleged addict to a specified place for a specific purpose, which shall be the place and purpose specified in the order. If the warrant commands the officer to bring the alleged addict to court and the court is not then in session, the alleged addict may be held at a facility designated by the department or at any other detention facility until the court is in session. The warrant shall be executed in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions as provided in subdivision (3) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 62.

21-28.2-4.
Medical examination.

The department shall designate facilities and physicians and establish procedures for the conduct of medical examinations pursuant to this chapter. In all these cases the department shall designate two (2) qualified physicians to examine the patient. The department shall provide for the use of accepted medical procedures, tests, and treatment, which may include, but are not limited to, narcotic antagonists and thin layer chromotography. Upon conclusion of the medical examination, the persons conducting the medical examination shall promptly transmit a report of the examination to the court that directed the medical examination. If after reviewing the report the court is not satisfied that there are reasonable grounds to believe the person is a narcotic addict, it shall dismiss the petition and discharge the person. If after reviewing the report the court is satisfied that there are reasonable grounds to believe the person is a narcotic addict, it shall proceed as hereinafter provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-5.
Determination of narcotic addiction.

The court shall promptly advise the alleged narcotic addict that the petition and the report of the medical examination set forth reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict, shall give him or her a copy of the report, and explain that if the court finds him or her to be a narcotic addict he or she shall be certified to the care and custody of the department for an indefinite period not exceeding three (3) years, provided that facilities are available. The court shall then advise the alleged narcotic addict that he or she has a right to a hearing before the court or a jury trial, without fee, as provided in this section. If the alleged narcotic addict appears without counsel, the court shall advise the person of his or her right to counsel and proceed in regard thereto as provided in subdivision (4) of §

21-28.2-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-6.
No application for hearing or jury trial.

When no application is made for a hearing before the court or a jury trial by or on behalf of the alleged narcotic addict, the court shall, if satisfied that the person is a narcotic addict, immediately issue an order certifying the person to the care and custody of the department for the indefinite period as provided in §

21-28.2-8

, provided that facilities are available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-7.
Application for hearing or jury trial.

Upon demand by the alleged narcotic addict or anyone on his or her behalf, the court shall, or it may upon its own motion, issue an order directing the hearing of the application before the court unless the alleged addict requests a hearing before a jury. If the proceeding is in the district court, upon request, the matter shall be transferred to the superior court for the hearing and determination. The order shall be served upon the parties interested in the application and upon any other person that the court, in its discretion, may name. If the alleged addict elects a hearing before the court, he or she shall not be entitled to a jury trial. If a jury is requested, it shall be held in accordance with the rules of the superior court. At the time and place designated for the hearing by the appropriate court, it and the jury, if requested, shall proceed to hear the testimony introduced for and against the application, and the alleged narcotic addict may be examined, if deemed advisable. The court may issue subpoenas for attendance of witnesses at the hearing or trial and the alleged narcotic addict shall have the right to have subpoenas issued for this purpose. At the hearing or trial the alleged narcotic addict shall have the right to be represented by counsel, to present witnesses on his or her behalf, and to cross-examine witnesses. For purposes of this section, in a proceeding in which the alleged addict’s spouse is the petitioner, no communication made by the alleged addict to the spouse shall be deemed confidential within the provision of the general laws relating to confidential communications between husband and wife. If, from the facts ascertained upon the hearing, the proofs produced, the petition, and the report of the medical examination, the jury or, if there is no jury, the court, shall determine that the person is a narcotic addict, the court shall immediately issue an order certifying that person to the care and custody of the department for the period provided in §

21-28.2-8

, provided that facilities are available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 4.

21-28.2-8.
Period of commitment.

The period of commitment to the department shall be a period of unspecified duration which shall commence and terminate as provided in subsection (b) of this section and the court shall not fix the minimum or maximum length of the period.

The period shall commence on the date the order of certification is made provided that facilities are available, and shall terminate upon the first to occur of:

The discharge of the narcotic addict by the department as rehabilitated; or

The expiration of a period of thirty-six (36) months from the date the period commenced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-9.
Private session — Records of proceedings.

Unless the alleged narcotic addict requests, all proceedings under this chapter shall be private and shall be conducted in closed sessions. The petition, the report of the medical examination, the order directing a hearing before the court or a jury trial, if one is issued, the decision of the court, and the order of certification shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court in which the proceedings under this chapter were had, and copies shall be presented to the department at the time of commitment of the narcotic addict to the department. The court shall order all these filed papers in the clerk’s office and all other papers in the proceeding sealed, and exhibited only to the parties to the proceedings, or someone properly interested, upon order of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 4.

21-28.2-10.
Writ of habeas corpus — Discharge.

If a writ of habeas corpus is obtained in behalf of a person certified to the department, and it appears at the hearing on the return to the writ that the person may properly be discharged, the judge or justice before whom the hearing is had shall direct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-11.
Detention — Pending hearings.

The court may, in an appropriate case, direct the detention of an alleged narcotic addict in any detention facility designated by the department on pending proceedings pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-12.
Retention, supervision, and transfer.

The department may retain any narcotic addict certified to its care and custody in a rehabilitation center or other facility designated by the department, or under any form of supervision it may deem appropriate, or may assign or transfer the narcotic addict to the facilities or supervision of any other department or agency of the state or of a person, association, or corporation providing facilities or services approved by the department provided that any assignment or transfer shall be pursuant to procedures prescribed by law and rules and regulations adopted by the department and agreed to by the department, agency, person, association, or corporation, and provided, that no narcotic addict certified to the care and custody of the department pursuant to §§

21-28.2-3

—

21-28.2-11

shall be assigned or transferred to any correctional institution. A person assigned or transferred shall continue to be under the jurisdiction of the department except that the person shall be temporarily cared for, treated, or supervised by the department, agency, person, association, or corporation to which he or she is transferred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-13.
Preservation of rights.

The certification of a narcotic addict to the care and custody of the department pursuant to §§

21-28.2-3

—

21-28.2-11

, or the transfer of the narcotic addict pursuant to §

21-28.2-12

, shall not forfeit or abridge any of the rights of the narcotic addict as a citizen of the United States or of the state of Rhode Island, nor shall the provisions of the election law depriving or limiting the right of a person admitted or certified to a mental institution to register or vote be applicable to the narcotic addict; nor shall the facts or proceedings relating to the admission, certification, or treatment of the narcotic addict be used against that person in any proceeding in any court, other than a proceeding pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-14.
Proceedings with respect to juveniles.

Nothing in this chapter shall deprive any narcotic addict of the right to the jurisdiction of the family court, provided that if the family court in accordance with the procedures as set out in this chapter determines that any person is a narcotic addict the court shall certify the defendant to the care and custody of the department in accordance with the procedures specified in this chapter, provided that facilities are available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-14.1.
Appeals.

A party aggrieved by a final order of a court entered in a proceeding brought under this chapter may appeal that order to the supreme court in accordance with the procedures contained in the rules of appellate procedure of the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 5.

21-28.2-15.
Chapter inapplicable in criminal cases.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable with respect to any person against whom there is pending a criminal charge, whether by indictment or by information, which has not been fully determined or who is on probation or whose sentence following conviction on that charge, including any time on parole or mandatory release, has not been fully served, except that:

This provision shall be applicable to any person on probation, parole, or mandatory release if the authority authorized to require that person’s return to custody consents to his or her commitment;

This provision shall be applicable to any person who is before a judge or justice on any criminal charge, only if the judge or justice finds reasonable grounds to believe that the person is a narcotic addict. If the judge or justice finds such reasonable grounds he or she shall inform the director of health of this finding and the director of health shall then proceed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 40.

21-28.2-16.
Department’s consent to certification.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, no narcotic addict shall be certified to the care and custody of the department unless the department consents to the certification and facilities are available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-17.
Care, custody, and supervision of narcotic addicts.

The department shall establish regulations and standards for custody, release, aftercare, and aftercare supervision of narcotic addicts who have been certified to its care and custody pursuant to any provision of this chapter.

A person who has been certified to the care and custody of the department pursuant to any provision of this chapter who, while confined in any facility, escapes from the facility, or who either fails to report as required or who absconds from aftercare supervision shall be declared delinquent by the department as of the date of escape, failure to report, or abscondence. The declaration of delinquency shall interrupt the period of the commitment as of the date of delinquency and the interruption shall continue until the return of the person to the facility from which he or she escaped or until his or her return to the authorized supervision of the department.

The department shall have the power to issue a warrant for the arrest of a person declared delinquent by it. A warrant issued pursuant to this subsection shall be directed to any police officer in the state for execution. The warrant shall constitute sufficient authority to hold in temporary custody the person retaken pursuant to it until the time as the person can be returned to the department and no order of commitment shall be necessary for it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 242, § 1.

21-28.2-18.
Discharge of certified narcotic addicts.

Any other provisions of this article notwithstanding, a narcotic addict certified to the care and custody of the department may be discharged from that care and custody in order to serve another certification, commitment, or sentence, provided the period of the other certification, commitment, or sentence is likely to extend beyond the termination of the certification from which he or she would be discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-19.
Aftercare — Supervision of certain narcotic addicts.

The department shall establish and conduct programs of care and supervision for narcotic addicts into which narcotic addicts who have completed a prescribed course of inpatient treatment may be placed upon the department’s determination that the narcotic addict will benefit by supervision and aftercare treatment. The facilities and programs for supervision and aftercare by private agencies and agencies of political subdivisions of the state shall be reviewed and approved by the department to determine if they conform to the standards established by the department. The department shall establish regulations and standards for release and aftercare placement of narcotic addicts. The department shall have the power to order any narcotic addict from aftercare supervision to inpatient treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-20.
Approval of rehabilitation facilities and service.

No narcotic addict certified to the care and custody of the department shall be assigned or transferred to or retained by any person, association, or corporation operating a facility for the care, treatment, or rehabilitation of narcotic addicts, or providing organized services for the treatment, care, or rehabilitation of narcotic addicts, unless the facility or services have been approved by the department pursuant to this section. That approval shall be granted pursuant to rules and regulations of the department which rules and regulations shall prescribe standards of good moral character, financial responsibility, adequacy of buildings and equipment, quality of care, qualifications of personnel, and form of records to be maintained, and shall provide for periodic review of the approval.

An application for the approval of the department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be filed with the director together with any other forms and information that shall be prescribed by, or acceptable to, the department.

If the department proposes to disapprove the application, it shall afford the applicant an opportunity to request a public hearing. If requested, a public hearing shall be held and may be conducted by the director or the director’s duly appointed designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-21.
Annual appropriation.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.

21-28.2-22.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of that court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 163, § 1.